Utah statutes.
9-1-808.   Meetings -- Quorum.

(1)  The commission shall meet at least quarterly.  Any commission member who fails to attend at least 75% of called meetings in any calendar year shall be automatically removed from the commission.

(2)  A quorum is a simple majority of the voting members.

